Maryland, session 2026, SB0239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
25–304.
A member of the Correctional Officers’ Retirement System who previously
terminated membership and withdrew accumulated contributions from either the
Correctional Officers’ Retirement System, the Employees’ Retirement System, [or] THE
EMPLOYEES’ PENSION SYSTEM, the Teachers’ Retirement System, OR THE TEACHERS’
PENSION SYSTEM may receive service credit for the period of employment during the
previous membership if the member redeposits in a single payment the withdrawn
accumulated contributions plus regular interest to the date of redeposit.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0239*

SENATE BILL 239
1, 2026.